Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 801.040 is amended to read:
801.040. This section describes circumstances where  special provisions are made concerning the
authority of cities, counties  or other political subdivisions in relation to some portion of the vehicle
code. This section is not the only  section of the vehicle code that applies to such authority and shall
not be interpreted to affect  the vehicle code except as specifically provided in this section. The
following limits are partial or complete as described:
(1) No county, municipal or other local body with authority to adopt and administer local  police
regulations under the Constitution and laws of this state shall enact or enforce any rule  or regu-
lation in conflict with the provisions of the vehicle  code described in this subsection except as
specifically  authorized  in the vehicle code. This subsection applies to the provisions of the vehicle
code relating to abandoned vehicles, vehicle equipment, regulation of vehicle size,  weight and load,
the manner of operation of vehicles and use of roads by persons, animals and vehicles.
(2) Except as  provided in ORS 822.230 and this subsection, no city, county or other political
subdivisions shall regulate or require or issue any registration, licenses, permits  or surety bonds or
charge any fee for the regulatory  or surety registration of any person required to obtain a certif-
icate from the Department of Transportation under ORS 822.205. This subsection does not:
(a) Limit any authority of a city or county to license and collect a general  and
nondiscriminatory license fee levied upon all businesses or to levy a  tax based upon business con-
ducted by any person within the city or county.
(b) Limit the authority of any city or county to impose any  requirements or conditions as part
of any contract to perform towing or recovering services for the city or county.
(c) Limit the authority of  any city or county to impose requirements and conditions that govern
the towing of a vehicle by a towing business under ORS 98.812 so long as those  requirements and
conditions are consistent with the provisions of ORS 822.230.
(3) No city, county  or other political subdivision of this state, nor any state agency, may adopt
a regulation or ordinance  that imposes a special fee for the use of public lands or waters by
snowmobiles or Class I all-terrain vehicles, or for the use of any access thereto that is owned  by
or under the jurisdiction of either the United States, this state or any such city, county or  other
political subdivision. The registration fees provided by ORS 821.320 are in lieu of  any personal
property or excise tax imposed on  snowmobiles by this state or any political subdivision. No city,
county or other municipality, and no  state agency shall impose any other registration or license fee
Enrolled House Bill 2155 (HB 2155-A) Page 1
on any snowmobile in this state. This  subsection does not prohibit any city, county or other political
subdivision, or any state agency from regulating the operation of snowmobiles or Class  I all-terrain
vehicles on public lands, waters and other properties under its jurisdiction and on streets or high-
ways within its boundaries by adopting regulations or ordinances of its governing body if such reg-
ulations are not inconsistent with ORS 821.150 to 821.292.
(4) The provisions of ORS 819.110 to 819.215 relating to towing of vehicles  that are abandoned
establish minimum requirements subject to the following:
(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, a county or incorporated city may  super-
sede such provisions by ordinance or charter provision.
(b) Any road authority described under ORS 810.010 may adopt rules or procedures that do  not
conflict with such provisions to provide for additional protection  for the owner or person with an
interest in a vehicle subject to such provisions or  that more quickly accomplish the procedures es-
tablished under such provisions.
(5) Any incorporated city may [ by ordinance ] require that the driver of  a vehicle involved in an
accident file with a designated city department  a copy of any report required to be filed under ORS
811.725. All such reports shall be for the  confidential use of the city department , including law
enforcement agencies, as defined in ORS 811.747, for  investigatory purposes, but subject to the
same requirements for release  of such reports as provided for the release of such reports by the
department under ORS 802.220 and 802.240.
(6) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, in accordance with  the provisions
of ORS 801.041, the governing body of a county may establish by  ordinance registration fees for
vehicles registered at a residence or business address within the county.
(7) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, in accordance with  the provisions
of ORS 801.042, the  governing body of a district may establish by ordinance registration fees for
vehicles registered at a residence or business address within the district.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 802.220 is amended to read:
802.220. (1) Except  as otherwise provided in this subsection and ORS 802.177, the records the
Department of Transportation maintains under ORS 802.200 on  vehicles are public records. The re-
cords of vehicles registered under  ORS 805.060 are not public records and are exempt from public
inspection as provided under ORS 181A.220 and are for the confidential use of criminal justice
agencies described under ORS 181A.010. The department may  charge the fee established under ORS
802.230 for furnishing information under this section concerning a vehicle or its owner.
(2) The department may charge the fee  established under ORS 802.230 for furnishing to the
public information from the records the department maintains under ORS  802.200 concerning driver
licenses or driver permits.
(3) The records the department  keeps under ORS 802.200 on judgments or convictions under
ORS 810.375 shall be open to the inspection of any person during reasonable business hours. Nothing
in this subsection authorizes the release of personal information as defined in ORS 802.175.
(4) The department shall upon request furnish any person certified abstracts of the  employment
driving record and the nonemployment driving  record of any person whose driving records are
maintained under ORS 802.200.  If an abstract of the employment driving record is not specifically
requested, the department  shall only furnish an abstract of the nonemployment driving record.
Nothing in this subsection authorizes  the release of personal information as defined in ORS 802.175.
The department shall collect the fee established  for abstracts of driving records under ORS 802.230.
A certified abstract issued under this section  shall not contain any of the following, unless the ab-
stract is being requested under ORS 746.265 (3):
(a) Any accident or conviction for violation of motor  vehicles laws that occurred more than
three years immediately preceding a request for abstract.
(b) Any suspension ordered under ORS 809.220 after the department has  received notice to
reinstate a person’s suspended driving privileges under ORS 809.220.
(c) Any  diversion agreement under ORS 813.220 entered into more than three years immediately
preceding a request for the abstract.
Enrolled House Bill 2155 (HB 2155-A) Page 2
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, accident reports filed with the  department
under ORS 811.725, 811.730 or 811.735 shall  be without prejudice to the individual filing the report
and shall be for the confidential use of state administrative and  enforcement agencies , including
law enforcement agencies  for investigatory purposes . The department may use the confidential
accident reports to provide the following information to the persons described:
(a) Upon  request, the department shall disclose the following information to any party involved
in the accident or to their personal representative or any member of the family of a party  involved
in the accident:
(A) The identity of  the owner, driver, occupants and the registration number of a vehicle in-
volved in the accident;
(B) The names of any companies insuring the owner  or driver of a vehicle involved in the ac-
cident; and
(C) The names of any witnesses to the accident.
(b) The department shall furnish a certificate showing that a specified  accident report has or
has not been made to the department upon demand of any  person who has or claims to have made
such a report or upon demand of a court.
(6) The department shall tabulate and may analyze all accident reports to  develop statistical
information based thereon as to the number and circumstances of traffic accidents. The  department
shall publish information compiled under this section in the manner provided under ORS 802.050.
(7) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the  records the department is required un-
der ORS 802.200 to maintain on trip permits issued under ORS 803.600 are public records. The  de-
partment may charge a fee established  under ORS 802.230 for furnishing information from the
records on trip permits. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the  release of personal information
as defined in ORS 802.175.
(8) The records the department  maintains under ORS 802.200 concerning odometer readings for
vehicles are public records. The department may separately  furnish information concerning
odometer readings shown by its records.  The department may charge the fee established under ORS
802.230 for information separately provided under this subsection. Nothing  in this subsection au-
thorizes the release of personal information as defined in ORS 802.175.
(9) As used in this section, “law enforcement agency” has the meaning given  that term
in ORS 811.747.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 811.747.
(b) “Personal information” means the following information that identifies an individual:
(A) A Social Security number;
(B) A driver license number or identification card number  issued by this state or another
jurisdiction;
(C) A passport number or other identification number issued by the United States; and
(D) A financial account number, credit card number  or debit card number, in combina-
tion with any required  security code, access code or password that would permit access to
an individual’s financial account,  or any other information or combination of information
that a person reasonably knows or should know would permit access to the individual’s  fi-
nancial account.
(2) Law enforcement agencies may:
(a) Retain copies of police reports submitted to the Department of Transportation  under
ORS 810.460; and
(b) Share information  in the police reports that is not personal information with service
providers contracted by the agencies to aid the agencies.
Enrolled House Bill 2155 (HB 2155-A) Page 3
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2155 (HB 2155-A) Page 4